test/src/morphology/V-uvdded_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - uˊvdded: # Verb 'to give' - full paradigm
     uˊvdded+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ooudam
     uˊvdded+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: ooudak
     uˊvdded+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: oudd
     uˊvdded+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: uˊvddep
     uˊvdded+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: uˊvddveˊted
     uˊvdded+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: ouˊdde
     uˊvdded+V+Ind+Prs+4: uuˊdet
     uˊvdded+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: uˊvddem
     uˊvdded+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: uˊvddiǩ
     uˊvdded+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: uuˊdi
     uˊvdded+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [uuˊdim, uuˊdin]
     uˊvdded+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: uuˊdid
     uˊvdded+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: uˊvdde
     uˊvdded+V+Ind+Prt+4: uˊvddeš 
     uˊvdded+V+Pot+Sg1: uuˊdžem
     uˊvdded+V+Pot+Sg2: uuˊdžiǩ
     uˊvdded+V+Pot+Sg3: uuˊdež
     uˊvdded+V+Pot+Pl1: [uuˊdžep, uuˊdžim]
     uˊvdded+V+Pot+Pl2: uuˊdžid
     uˊvdded+V+Pot+Pl3: uuˊdže
     uˊvdded+V+Pot+4: uuˊdžet
     uˊvdded+V+Pot+ConNeg: uuˊdže
     uˊvdded+V+Cond+Sg1: ooudčem
     uˊvdded+V+Cond+Sg2: ooudčiǩ
     uˊvdded+V+Cond+Sg3: ooudči
     uˊvdded+V+Cond+Pl1: [ooudčim, ooudčep]
     uˊvdded+V+Cond+Pl2: ooudčid
     uˊvdded+V+Cond+Pl3: ooudče
     uˊvdded+V+Cond+4: ooudčeš
     uˊvdded+V+Cond+ConNeg: ooudče
     uˊvdded+V+Imp+Sg2: uuˊd
     uˊvdded+V+Imp+Sg3: ooudas
     uˊvdded+V+Imp+Pl1: uˊvddep
     uˊvdded+V+Imp+Pl2: uˊvdded
     uˊvdded+V+Imp+Pl3: ouddaz
     uˊvdded+V+Imp+ConNeg: uvddu
     uˊvdded+V+Action: uˊvddem
     uˊvdded+V+ActEss: uˊvddmen
     uˊvdded+V+PrsPrc: uˊvddi
     uˊvdded+V+PrfPrc: ouddam
     uˊvdded+V+Pass+PrfPrc: uvddum
     uˊvdded+V+VAbess: [uuˊdkâni, uuˊdkani, uuˊdǩeânai]
     uˊvdded+V+GerTemp: uuˊdeen
     uˊvdded+V+GerInstr: uuˊdeeˊl
